West Virginia, session 2026, SB313.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Department of Agriculture. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §19-5-1 of this code, modified by the Department of Agriculture to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 18, 2025, relating to the Department of Agriculture (grades and standards for apples, 61 CSR 08), is authorized.